North Carolina, session 2025, SB620.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. TITLE
SECTION 1.1. This act shall be known as "The STRONG Act of 2025."

PART II. FINDINGS AND PURPOSE
SECTION 2.1. The General Assembly makes the following findings of fact:
(1) North Carolina is experiencing a severe opioid crisis, with fentanyl and
synthetic opioids contributing to record-high overdose deaths.
(2) The State lacks comprehensive measures to address substance use disorder
prevention, rehabilitation, and treatment access, particularly in rural and
underserved communities.
(3) The Controlled Substances Reporting System (CSRS) has been effective in
tracking prescription drug abuse, but it must be expanded to monitor
additional substances.
(4) Medical cannabis has been shown to provide relief for chronic pain, Post
Traumatic Stress Disorder, and seizure disorders. North Carolina should
implement a tightly regulated Medical Cannabis Pilot Program.
(5) Law enforcement lacks sufficient resources and training to handle synthetic
opioids safely and to combat cartel-driven drug trafficking.
(6) A public education campaign is needed to raise awareness about fentanyl
risks, treatment options, and drug prevention.
*S620-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
PART III. INCREASED PENALTIES FOR TRAFFICKING IN OPIUM, OPIATES,
OPIOIDS, OR HEROIN
SECTION 3.1.(a) G.S. 90-95(h)(4) reads as rewritten:
"(4) Any person who sells, manufactures, delivers, transports, or possesses four
grams or more of opium, opiate, or opioid, or any salt, compound, derivative,
or preparation of opium, opiate, or opioid (except apomorphine, nalbuphine,
analoxone and naltrexone and their respective salts), including heroin, or any
mixture containing such substance, shall be guilty of a felony which felony
shall be known as "trafficking in opium, opiate, opioid, or heroin" and if the
quantity of such controlled substance or mixture involved:
a. Is fourtwo grams or more, but less than 14 grams, such person shall be
punished as a Class FE felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum
term of 7090 months and a maximum term of 93120 months in the
State's prison and shall be fined as follows:
1. A fine of fivetwo hundred fifty thousand dollars
($500,000)($250,000) if the controlled substance is heroin,
fentanyl, or carfentanil, or any salt, compound, derivative, or
preparation thereof, or any mixture containing any of these
substances.
2. A fine of not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for any
controlled substance described in this subdivision and not
otherwise subject to sub-sub-subdivision 1. of this
sub-subdivision.
b. Is 14 grams or more, but less than 28 grams, such person shall be
punished as a Class ED felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum
term of 90180 months and a maximum term of 120225 months in the
State's prison and shall be fined as follows:
1. A fine of sevenfive hundred fifty thousand dollars
($750,000)($500,000) if the controlled substance is heroin,
fentanyl, or carfentanil, or any salt, compound, derivative, or
preparation thereof, or any mixture containing any of these
substances.
2. A fine of not less than one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) for any controlled substance described in this
subdivision and not otherwise subject to sub-sub-subdivision
1. of this sub-subdivision.
c. Is 28 grams or more, such person shall be punished as a Class CB1
felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum term of 225 months and a
maximum term of 282 monthslife imprisonment without parole in the
State's prison and shall be fined as follows:
1. A fine of onetwo million dollars ($1,000,000)($2,000,000) if
the controlled substance is heroin, fentanyl, or carfentanil, or
any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation thereof, or any
mixture containing any of these substances.
2. A fine of not less than five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000) for any controlled substance described in this
subdivision and not otherwise subject to sub-sub-subdivision
1. of this sub-subdivision.
Subject to any applicable State law, federal law, or constitutional
requirements, a law enforcement agency investigating an offense under this
subdivision may intercept, endeavor to intercept, or procure any other person
Page 2 Senate Bill 620-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
to intercept or endeavor to intercept, any wire, oral, or electronic
communication."
SECTION 3.1.(b) This section becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to
offenses committed on or after that date.

INCREASED PENALTIES FOR CERTAIN DEATH BY DISTRIBUTION OFFENSES
SECTION 3.2.(a) G.S. 14-18.4(h) reads as rewritten:
"(h) Penalties. – Unless the conduct is covered under some other provision of law
providing greater punishment, the following classifications apply to the offenses set forth in this
section:
(1) A violation of subsection (a1) of this section is a Class C felony.
(1a) A violation of subsection (a2) or (b) of this section is a Class B2B1 felony.
(2) A violation of subsection (c) of this section is a Class B1A felony."
SECTION 3.2.(b) This section becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to
offenses committed on or after that date.

INCREASED PENALTIES FOR TRAFFICKING IN OPIUM, OPIATES, OPIOIDS, OR
HEROIN NEAR SCHOOLS AND CERTAIN OTHER PUBLIC PLACES
SECTION 3.3.(a) G.S. 90-95(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) The prescribed punishment and degree of any offense under this Article shall be
subject to the following conditions, but the punishment for an offense may be increased only by
the maximum authorized under any one of the applicable conditions:
…
(11) Any person 21 years of age or older who commits an offense under
G.S. 90-95(h)(4) on property used for a child care center, or for an elementary
or secondary school, or for a playground, or within 1,500 feet of the boundary
of real property used for a child care center, an elementary or secondary
school, or a playground, shall be punished as a Class B1 felon. For purposes
of this subdivision, the term "child care center" is as defined in subdivision
(8) of this subsection.
(12) Any person 21 years of age or older who commits an offense under
G.S. 90-95(h)(4) on property used for a public park, shopping mall, or transit
station, or within 1,500 feet of the boundary of real property used for a public
park, shopping mall, or transit station, shall have the minimum term of
imprisonment to which the person is sentenced for that felony increased by 60
months."
SECTION 3.3.(b) This section becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to
offenses committed on or after that date.

PART IV. LAW ENFORCEMENT TRAINING AND RESOURCES

FUND STATE BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION DRUG TASK FORCE
SECTION 4.1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the State Bureau
of Investigation the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026
fiscal year to be used to support and expand its Drug Task Force.
SECTION 4.1.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.

ESTABLISH STATE AND FEDERAL DRUG INTERDICTION TASK FORCE
SECTION 4.2. Article 5 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 90-95.2A. Establish State and Federal Drug Interdiction Task Force.
Senate Bill 620-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) Task Force Established. – There is established the State and Federal Drug Interdiction
Task Force within the Department of Public Safety.
(b) Membership. – The Task Force shall consist of 9 members. The composition of the
Task Force shall include the following members:
(1) The Secretary of the Department of Public Safety or the Secretary's designee.
(2) The Director of the State Bureau of Investigation or the Director's designee.
(3) The Commander of the State Highway Patrol or the Commander's designee.
(4) The Chairman of the North Carolina Sheriffs' Association or the Chairman's
designee.
(5) The President of the North Carolina Association of Chiefs of Police or the
President's designee.
(6) The Executive Director of the North Carolina Conference of District attorneys
or the Executive Director's designee.
(7) At the invitation of the State, the Administrator of the United State Drug
Enforcement Administration or the Administrator's designee. This member
shall be a nonvoting member.
(8) At the invitation of the State, the Director of United States Immigration and
Customs Enforcement or the Director's designee. This member shall be a
nonvoting member.
(9) At the invitation of the State, the Chief of the United States Border Patrol or
the Chief's designee. This member shall be a nonvoting member.
(c) Purpose. – The purpose of the Task Force is to encourage and effectuate collaboration
between State and federal entities for the interdiction of illegal controlled substances within the
State of North Carolina.
(d) Chair; Meetings; Quorum. – The members shall elect a chair, and the Task Force shall
meet at the call of the chair. A majority of the Task Force shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of its business.
(e) Per Diem, Travel, and Expenses. – Members of the Task Force shall receive per diem
and necessary travel and subsistence expenses in accordance with G.S. 120-3.1, 138-5, and
138-6, as applicable.
(f) Report. – No later than March 1 of each year, the Task Force shall report to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety any findings, legislative proposals,
or other information the Task Force determines would aid State and federal law enforcement
officers and agencies in the interdiction of illegal controlled substances within the State of North
Carolina.

REQUIRE MANDATORY OPIOID DETECTION TRAINING FOR ALL LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS
SECTION 4.3.(a) G.S. 17C-6(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 17C-6. Powers of Commission.
(a) In addition to powers conferred upon the Commission elsewhere in this Article, the
Commission shall have the following powers, which shall be enforceable through its rules and
regulations, certification procedures, or the provisions of G.S. 17C-10:
…
(14) Establish minimum standards for in-service training for criminal justice
officers. In-service training standards for sworn law enforcement officers shall
include all of the following training topics:
…
j. Opioid detection.
…."
SECTION 4.3.(b) G.S. 17E-4(a) reads as rewritten:
Page 4 Senate Bill 620-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 17E-4. Powers and duties of the Commission.
(a) The Commission shall have the following powers, duties, and responsibilities, which
are enforceable through its rules and regulations, certification procedures, or the provisions of
G.S. 17E-8 and G.S. 17E-9:
…
(11) Establish minimum standards for in-service training for justice officers.
In-service training standards for sworn law enforcement officers shall include
all of the following training topics:
…
j. Opioid detection.
…."
SECTION 4.3.(c) This section becomes effective January 1, 2026, and applies to
in-service training occurring on or after that date.

PART V. CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES REPORTING SYSTEM EXPANSION AND
UPGRADES
SECTION 5.1.(a) G.S. 90-113.73 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-113.73. Requirements for controlled substances reporting system; civil penalties for
failure to properly report.
…
(b) The Commission shall adopt rules requiring dispensers to report the following
information. The Commission may modify these requirements as necessary to carry out the
purposes of this Article. The dispenser shall report:
(1) The dispenser's DEA number for prescriptions of controlled substances, and
for prescriptions of gabapentin, xylazine, and nitazenes whether the dispenser
has a DEA number.
(2) The name of the patient for whom the controlled substance is being dispensed,
and the patient's:
a. Full address, including city, state, and zip code.
b. Telephone number.
c. Date of birth.
(3) The date the prescription was written.
(4) The date the prescription was filled.
(5) The prescription number.
(6) Whether the prescription is new or a refill.
(7) The metric quantity of the dispensed drug.
(8) The estimated days of supply of dispensed drug, if provided to the dispenser.
(9) The National Drug Code of dispensed drug.
(10) The prescriber's DEA number for prescriptions of controlled substances, and
for prescriptions of gabapentin, xylazine, and nitazenes if the prescriber has a
DEA number and the number is known by the dispenser.
(10a) The presciber's prescriber's national provider identification number, for any
prescriber that has a national provider identification number. A pharmacy
shall not be subject to a civil penalty under subsection (e) of this section for
failure to report the prescriber's national provider identification number when
it is not received by the pharmacy.
(11) The method of payment for the prescription.
(c) A dispenser shall not be required to report instances in which a controlled substance,
or gabapentin, is xylazine, or nitazenes are provided directly to the ultimate user and the quantity
provided does not exceed a 48-hour supply.
Senate Bill 620-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c1) A dispenser shall not be required to report gabapentin to the controlled substances
reporting system when gabapentin is gabapentin, xylazine, or nitazenes are a component of a
compounded prescription that is dispensed in dosages of 100 milligrams or less.
(d) A dispenser shall not be required to report instances in which a Schedule V
non-narcotic, non-anorectic Schedule V controlled substance is provided directly to the ultimate
user for the purpose of assessing a therapeutic response when prescribed according to indications
approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration.
…
(f) For purposes of this section, a "dispenser" includes a person licensed to practice
veterinary medicine pursuant to Article 11 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes when that person
dispenses any Schedule II through V controlled substance or gabapentin.gabapentin, xylazine, or
nitazenes. Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, the Commission shall adopt rules
requiring the information to be reported by a person licensed to practice veterinary medicine
pursuant to Article 11 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.
…."
SECTION 5.1.(b) This section becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to
acts occurring on or after that date.
SECTION 5.2. Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services
(DMH/DD/SUS), the sum of three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to upgrade data analytics and automation within
the Controlled Substances Reporting System.
SECTION 5.3. The DMH/DD/SUS shall work towards connecting the Controlled
Substances Reporting System to federal data sharing networks through data sharing agreements
with federal agencies to track cross-border drug trafficking trends. The DMH/DD/SUS shall
submit a progress report on the status of its work under this section to the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division by
December 1, 2025.

PART VI. APPROPRIATIONS FOR OPIOID USE DISORDER EDUCATION,
PREVENTION, TREATMENT, AND RECOVERY SERVICES
SECTION 6.1. Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund
to the DMH/DD/SUS the sum of thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated and used as follows:
(1) Fentanyl Overdose Education and Prevention. – Five million dollars
($5,000,000) to do all of the following:
a. To conduct a statewide public awareness campaign targeting fentanyl
overdose prevention. These campaigns shall include, at a minimum,
public service announcements, billboards, and social media campaigns
focused on fentanyl overdose prevention.
b. To purchase naloxone for local health departments to distribute free of
charge to community groups and schools. Local health departments
that are recipients of these funds shall provide training free of charge
to the community groups and schools that are recipients of the
naloxone funded by this section.
c. To create a web page that publishes overdose data in real-time and
notifies the public about available treatment options and resources.
(2) Expansion of State-Funded Medication-Assisted Treatment Programs. –
Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) to do all of the following:
Page 6 Senate Bill 620-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. To expand State-funded medication-assisted treatment programs
throughout the State, with priority given to programs located in rural
or underserved counties experiencing high overdose rates.
b. To provide grants to counties for the purchase of mobile opioid
treatment units to be used to provide screening, assessment, treatment,
primary care, and recovery support services. In awarding grants
authorized by this subdivision, the DMH/DD/SUS shall give priority
to counties with the greatest shortage of medication-assisted treatment
providers.
c. To transfer funds to the Department of Justice to provide individuals
who are incarcerated with access to medication-assisted treatment
utilizing a medication approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for opioid use disorder.
(3) Expansion of Community-Based Rehabilitation Programs. – Eight million
dollars ($8,000,000) to do both of the following:
a. To provide directed grants on a competitive basis to charitable,
faith-based organizations, nonprofit organizations, and other
community-based organizations for the delivery or expansion of
opioid use disorder treatment and recovery programs or services.
b. It is the intention of the General Assembly to establish a certification
process for charitable, nonprofit, faith-based rehabilitation centers for
individuals with opioid use disorder and other substance use disorders.
To that end, the DMH/DD/SUS may use up to two percent (2%) of the
funds authorized by this subdivision to study and develop
recommendations on this issue. By May 1, 2026, the DMH/DD/SUS
shall report its findings and recommendations to the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal
Research Division. The DMH/DD/SUS shall not implement a
certification process for charitable, nonprofit, faith-based
rehabilitation centers without an act of the General Assembly.
(4) Rural Drug Crisis Response. – Seven million dollars ($7,000,000) to be used
to increase the number of mobile treatment clinics and to expand access to
telehealth addiction counseling services in rural areas of the State.

PART VII. TAX CREDIT FOR BUSINESSES THAT HIRE EMPLOYEES WHO
SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETE SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER TRAINING
SECTION 7.1.(a) Article 4 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 105-153.12. Substance use recovery tax credit.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Eligible business. – An employer that pays fair market wages to an eligible
employee for the requisite duration.
(2) Eligible employee. – An individual who (i) has been an employee of an
eligible business for the requisite duration and (ii) has successfully completed
substance use disorder counseling with a qualifying provider.
(3) Employee. – As defined in G.S. 105-163.1
(4) Employer. – As defined in G.S. 105-163.1.
(5) Individual. – As defined in G.S. 105-163.1.
(6) Pass-through entity. – A partnership, an S-corporation, or a limited liability
company subject to income tax under Part 1A or Part 2 of Article 4 of Chapter
105 of the General Statutes.
Senate Bill 620-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(7) Qualifying provider. – A substance use disorder counseling provider
registered, certified, or licensed under Article 5C of Chapter 90 of the General
Statutes.
(8) Requisite duration. – A period of time not less than eight months per calendar
year.
(9) Substance abuser. – As defined in G.S. 122C-3.
(10) Substance use disorder counseling. – As defined in G.S. 90-113.31A.
(11) Taxable year. – As defined in G.S. 105-163.1.
(12) Wages. – As defined in G.S. 105-163.1.
(b) Credit. – A taxpayer that is an eligible business is entitled to a nonrefundable income
tax credit against the taxes imposed by Part 1, Part 1A, or Part 2 of Article 4 of Chapter 105 of
the General Statutes, as appropriate, equal to two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per
eligible employee of the eligible business.
(c) Allocation. – This subsection applies to eligible businesses that are pass-through
entities. Each individual who is a shareholder, partner, or member of an eligible business that is
a pass-through entity must be allocated the credit allowed the entity in an amount determined in
the same manner as the proportionate shares of income or loss of such entity would be
determined. The entity must make an irrevocable election with the Department of Revenue as to
the manner in which the credit is allocated. If an individual's share of the pass-through entity's
credit is limited due to the maximum allowable credit under this section for a taxable year, the
entity and its owners may not reallocate the unused credit among the other owners.
(d) Limitation. – The credit allowed under this section per eligible business shall not
exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per taxable year.
(e) Substantiation. – A taxpayer allowed a credit under this section must maintain and
make available for inspection any information or records required by the Secretary of Revenue.
The burden of proving eligibility for a credit under this section rests upon the taxpayer. The
taxpayer must obtain and submit documentation from the qualifying provider verifying that the
eligible employee has successfully completed substance use disorder counseling; provided,
however, that an eligible employee may disclose, but shall not be required to disclose, any
protected health information protected by State or federal law."
SECTION 7.1.(b) This act is effective for taxable years beginning on or after January
1, 2025.

PART VIII. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 8.1. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 8 Senate Bill 620-First Edition